District of Columbia statutes.
8-812

Annual reporting requirement.

(a)

The Mayor shall submit to the Council statistics on the number of notices of infractions and violations issued for violation of regulations listed in § 8-802(a)(1), and the number of notices subsequently dismissed.

(b)

The statistics shall identify, by Ward, the number of notices issued and dismissed.

(c)

Statistics shall be provided on a calendar-year basis and shall be transmitted to the Council by January 31st, with the first report due January 31, 2010.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 13
as added Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-314, § 2(b), 56 DCR 200
redesignated as § 11b, Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 59(b), 59 DCR 6190
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 201(c), 61 DCR 9971
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-154 substituted “by Ward” for “by Metropolitan Police Department district” in (b).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated D.C. Law 6-100, § 13 as D.C. Law 6-100, § 11b .
Licensure, clean hands requirement, prohibition against issuance of licenses, see § 47-2862.